Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.220

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following mentioned terms shall have the following described meanings:

The term "commission" means the civil service commission herein created, and the term "commissioner" means any one of the three commissioners of that commission.

The term "appointing power" includes every person or group of persons who, acting singly or in conjunction, as a mayor, city manager, council, common council, commission, or otherwise, is or are, vested by law with power and authority to select, appoint, or employ any person to hold any office, place, position or employment subject to civil service.

The term "appointment" includes all means of selection, appointing or employing any person to hold any office, place, position or employment subject to civil service.

The term "city" includes all cities, towns and municipalities having a full paid fire department.

The term "full paid fire department" means that the officers and firefighters employed in such are paid regularly by the city and devote their whole time to firefighting.

[ 2007 c 218 s 9; 1935 c 31 s 24; RRS s 9558-24.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.